Idaho statutes. Title 25 ANIMALS
Chapter 30
FUR FARMS

Sec.

§ 25-3001. Fur farming deemed agricultural pursuit.

It shall be lawful for any person, persons, association or corporations to engage in the business of propagating, breeding, owning or controlling domestic fur-bearing animals, which are defined as fox, mink, chinchilla, marten, fisher, muskrat, beaver, bobcat, and other fur-bearing animals the department of agriculture may designate by rule, bred and raised in captivity for the purpose of harvesting pelts or providing replacement animals to fur farms that harvest pelts as their primary activity. For the purposes of all classification and administration of the laws of the state of Idaho, and all administrative orders and rules pertaining thereto, the breeding, raising, producing or marketing of such animals or their products by the producer shall be deemed an agricultural pursuit; such animals shall be deemed livestock and their products shall be deemed agricultural products; the persons engaged in such agricultural pursuits shall be deemed farmers, fur farmers, fur breeders, or fur ranchers; the premises within which such pursuit is conducted and domestic fur-bearing animals are raised for the purpose of harvesting pelts or providing replacement animals to fur farms that harvest pelts as their primary activity shall be deemed farms, fur farms, or fur ranches.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 1, p. 218; am. 2006, ch. 226, § 2, p. 677.

§ 25-3002. Transfer of functions from fish and game commission to department of agriculture.

All the functions of the fish and game commission and the fish and game department, which affect the breeding, raising, producing, marketing, or any other phase of the production or distribution, of domestic fur-bearing animals, or the products thereof, are hereby transferred to and vested in the department of agriculture and the administrator of the division of animal industries; provided, that this act shall not limit or affect the powers or duties of the fish and game commission and the fish and game department relating to nondomestic fur-bearing animals or the capture and taking thereof.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 2, p. 218; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 168, p. 364.

§ 25-3003. Application of laws relating to livestock and domestic animals.

All of the provisions of title 25, chapter 2, Idaho Code, as amended, applicable to livestock and domestic animals, except those provisions which by their terms are restricted to swine, bovine animals, dairy or breeding cattle, or range cattle, or other particular kind or kinds of livestock and domestic animals to the exclusion of livestock or domestic animals generally, are applicable to domestic fur-bearing animals.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 3, p. 218.

§ 25-3004. Rules for disease prevention.

The administrator of the division of animal industries is hereby authorized and empowered to make, promulgate, and enforce general and reasonable rules and regulations not inconsistent with law, for the prevention of the introduction or dissemination of diseases among domestic fur-bearing animals of this state, and to otherwise effectuate enforcement of the provisions of title 25, chapter 2, Idaho Code, applicable to domestic fur-bearing animals.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 4, p. 218; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 169, p. 364.

§ 25-3005. Inspection of fur farms.

The division of animal industries and any of its officers shall have the right at any time to inspect any fur farm, and may go upon such farms or any part thereof to inspect and examine the same and any animals therein.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 5, p. 218; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 170, p. 364.

§ 25-3006. Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of title 25, chapter 2, Idaho Code, applicable to domestic fur-bearing animals, or of the rules or regulations promulgated by the division of animal industries for the enforcement thereof shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each offense.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 6, p. 218; am. 1974, ch. 18, § 171, p. 364.

§ 25-3007. Property rights in fur-bearing animals.

Domestic fur-bearing animals shall be, together with their offspring and increases[,] the subject of ownership, lien and absolute property rights, (the same as purely domestic animals) in whatever situation, location, or condition such animals may thereafter become, or be, and regardless of their remaining in, or escaping from such restraint or captivity.

History.

1961, ch. 152, § 7, p. 218.